Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,142
District funds; treasurer not liable, when.

No treasurer of any such district shall be liable upon his bond for loss on account of any deposit in a bank which has been designated as the depository under the provisions of sections 46-1,139 to 46-1,142, and the security given by such bank has been approved by the board of directors of such district.

Laws 1935, c. 18, § 4, p. 94;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-1,107;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,142.